Washington statutes.
RCW 18.44.440

Violations—Cease and desist orders.

If the director determines after notice and hearing that a person has:

(1) Violated any provision of this chapter; or

(2) Directly, or through an agent or employee, engaged in any false, unfair and deceptive, or misleading:

(a) Advertising or promotional activity; or

(b) Business practices; or

(3) Violated any lawful order or rule of the director; the director may issue an order requiring the person to cease and desist from the unlawful practice and to take such affirmative action as in the judgment of the director will carry out the purposes of this chapter.

If the director makes a finding of fact in writing that the public interest will be irreparably harmed by delay in issuing an order, the director may issue a temporary cease and desist order. Every temporary cease and desist order shall include in its terms a provision that upon request a hearing will be held to determine whether or not the order becomes permanent.

[ 1999 c 30 s 19; 1977 ex.s. c 156 s 20. Formerly RCW 18.44.175.]